Maryland, session 2025, HB1555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Authorizing agent” has the meaning stated in § 5–508 of the Health – General
Article.
(i) “Director” means the Director of the Office of Cemetery Oversight.
(r) “Office” means the Office of Cemetery Oversight.
5–204.
(a) (2) In conjunction with the State Board of Morticians and Funeral
Directors, the Director shall:
(i) establish a process for regulating crematories and reduction
facilities that provides for:
1. registration of crematory operators and reduction facility
operators or issuance of permits for operating crematories and reduction facilities, and
renewal;
2. applications, including certification of ownership and
identification of individuals who will perform alkaline hydrolysis, cremation, or natural
organic reduction;
3. registration and permit fees;
4. inspections and oversight;
5. grounds for discipline and penalties; and

HOUSE BILL 1555
6. complaints and hearings; [and]
(II) ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT REQUIRE FUNERAL
ESTABLISHMENTS, CREMATORIES, AND REDUCTION FACILITIES TO MAINTAIN
ADEQUATE REFRIGERATED HOLDING FACILITIES TO ENSURE PROPER STORAGE OF
HUMAN REMAINS; AND
[(ii)] (III) adopt regulations that are identical to regulations adopted
by the State Board of Morticians and Funeral Directors to:
1. implement [item] ITEMS (i) AND (II) of this paragraph;
and
2. ensure public health and safety.
(b) (1) [Upon] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON
receipt of a written complaint, or at the discretion of the Director, the Director or the
Director’s designee may conduct an investigation and an inspection of the records and site
of a registered cemeterian, registered crematory operator, registered reduction operator,
registered seller, permit holder, or any other person subject to the registration or permit
provisions of this title.
(2) (I) EACH YEAR, THE DIRECTOR A TRAINED STAFF MEMBER OF
THE OFFICE WHO IS QUALIFIED TO DO INSPECTIONS SHALL CONDUCT AT LEAST TWO
UNANNOUNCED INSPECTIONS OF EACH REGISTERED CREMATORY OPERATOR AND
REGISTERED REDUCTION OPERATOR FACILITY THAT HAS BEEN REPRIMANDED
UNDER § 5–310 OF THIS TITLE WITHIN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 5 YEARS TO
ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH THIS TITLE.
(II) IF A REGISTERED CREMATORY OPERATOR OR REGISTERED
REDUCTION OPERATOR IS CITED FOR A SANITATION VIOLATION OR THE
MISHANDLING OF HUMAN REMAINS, THE DIRECTOR SHALL CONDUCT AN
UNANNOUNCED INSPECTION OF THE REGISTERED CREMATORY OR REGISTERED
REDUCTION OPERATOR WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE CITATION WAS ISSUED.
(3) THE DIRECTOR SHALL EMPLOY AT LEAST ONE INSPECTOR TO:
(I) ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH REGULATORY REQUIREMENTS;
(II) CONDUCT ROUTINE AND COMPLAINT–BASED INSPECTIONS;
AND
(III) RESPOND TO PUBLIC CONCERNS REGARDING VIOLATIONS
OF THIS TITLE.

HOUSE BILL 1555 5
5–207.
THE OFFICE SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE, ONLINE
DATABASE THAT INCLUDES INFORMATION ABOUT EACH VIOLATION BY
DISCIPLINARY ACTION TAKEN BY THE OFFICE UNDER § 5–310 OF THIS SUBTITLE
AGAINST, AND INSPECTION OF, AND COMPLAINT AGAINST A CREMATORY OR
REDUCTION FACILITY;
(2) NOTIFY THE AUTHORIZING AGENT WITHIN 24 HOURS AFTER THE
OFFICE BECOMES AWARE OF A DELAY, AN EQUIPMENT FAILURE, OR A REGULATORY
VIOLATION THAT INVOLVES A DECEDENT’S REMAINS; AND
(3) PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE EACH REPORT SUBMITTED BY THE
OFFICE TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY UNDER THIS TITLE.
5–208.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31 EACH YEAR, THE OFFICE SHALL SUBMIT A
REPORT TO THE SENATE FINANCE COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE HEALTH AND
GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THAT INCLUDES:
(1) THE RESULTS OF INSPECTIONS CONDUCTED UNDER § 5–204(B) OF
THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING ANY VIOLATIONS AND CORRECTIVE ACTIONS TAKEN;
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE INFORMATION REQUIRED TO BE REPORTED
UNDER § 5–311(H)(2) OF THIS TITLE, THE NUMBER OF COMPLAINTS RECEIVED AND
THE RESOLUTIONS OF EACH COMPLAINT; AND
(3) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR IMPROVING THE REGULATION OF
CREMATORIES AND REDUCTION FACILITIES.
5–310.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 5–312 of this subtitle, the Director may
deny a registration or permit to an applicant, reprimand a person subject to the registration
or permit provisions of this title, or suspend or revoke a registration or permit if an
applicant, registrant, or permit holder, or an agent, employee, officer, director, or partner
of the applicant, registrant, or permit holder:
(1) fraudulently or deceptively obtains or attempts to obtain a registration
or permit;

HOUSE BILL 1555
(2) fraudulently or deceptively uses a registration or permit;
(3) under the laws of the United States or of any state, is convicted of a:
(i) felony; or
(ii) misdemeanor that is directly related to the fitness and
qualifications of the applicant, registrant, or permit holder to own or operate a cemetery,
crematory, or reduction facility or provide burial goods;
(4) fails to provide or misrepresents any information required to be
provided under this title;
(5) violates this title;
(6) violates the code of ethics adopted by the Director;
(7) violates a regulation adopted under this title;
(8) fails to provide reasonable and adequate supervision of the operation of
the cemetery, crematory, or reduction facility or the provision of burial goods by agents,
employees, officers, directors, or partners affiliated with a cemetery, crematory, reduction
facility, or burial goods business;
(9) refuses to allow an inspection required by this title;
(10) fails to comply with an order of the Director;
(11) fails to comply with any terms of settlement under a binding arbitration
agreement;
(12) is found guilty by a court in this State of violating an unfair or deceptive
trade practices provision under Title 13 of the Commercial Law Article; or
(13) fails to comply with § 5–513 of the Health – General Article.
(b) (1) If a person is charged with a violation of this title that could result in
suspension or revocation of a registration or permit, the Director may seek an immediate
restraining order in a circuit court in this State to prohibit the person from engaging in the
operation of any cemetery, crematory, reduction facility, or burial goods business.
(2) The restraining order is in effect until:
(i) the court lifts the order; or
(ii) the charges are adjudicated or dismissed.

HOUSE BILL 1555 7
(c) If a person is charged with a violation of this title that could result in
suspension or revocation of a registration or permit, the Director may petition a court to:
(1) appoint a receiver or trustee to take charge of the assets and operate
the business of the person in the event that the registration or permit is suspended or
revoked; and
(2) take any actions as are appropriate to protect the public interest.
(d) Instead of or in addition to reprimanding a person, or suspending or revoking
a registration or permit, the Director may impose a civil penalty:
(1) not to exceed $5,000 for each violation of this title or an order of the
Director under this title; and
(2) not to exceed $500 for each day a violation continues past the time set
for its correction.
(E) IF THE DIRECTOR FINDS THAT A PERSON HAS VIOLATED THIS TITLE
WITH GROSS NEGLIGENCE, IMPROPERLY HANDLED HUMAN REMAINS, OR
REPEATEDLY VIOLATED THIS TITLE, THE PERSON IS SUBJECT TO:
(1) A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $50,000 $25,000;
(2) PERMANENT REVOCATION OF LICENSURE; AND
(3) REFERRAL UNDER § 5–905(A)(2) OF THIS TITLE FOR CRIMINAL
PROSECUTION.
[(e)] (F) To determine the amount of the penalty imposed under this
[subsection] SECTION, the Director shall consider:
(1) the seriousness of the violation;
(2) the harm caused by the violation;
(3) the good faith efforts of the person; and
(4) any history of previous violations by the person.
[(f)] (G) Any civil penalties collected under this section shall be paid into the
General Fund of the State.
[(g)] (H) The Director shall consider the following facts in the granting, denial,
renewal, suspension, or revocation of a registration or permit or the reprimand of a

HOUSE BILL 1555
registrant or permit holder when an applicant, registrant, or permit holder, or an agent,
employee, officer, director, or partner of an applicant, registrant, or permit holder is
convicted of a felony or misdemeanor described in subsection (a)(3) of this section:
(1) the nature of the crime;
(2) the relationship of the crime to the activities authorized by this title;
(3) with respect to a felony, the relevance of the conviction to the fitness
and qualifications of the applicant, registrant, or permit holder, or agent, employee, officer,
director, or partner to operate a cemetery or provide burial goods;
(4) the length of time since the conviction; and
(5) the behavior and activities of the applicant, registrant, or permit
holder, or any agent, employee, officer, director, or partner before and after the conviction.
Article – Health – General
5–508.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Authorizing agent” means the individual who has legal authority to arrange
for and make decisions regarding the final disposition of a dead human body, including by
cremation, alkaline hydrolysis, or natural organic reduction.
Article – Health Occupations
7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c–1) “Authorizing agent” has the meaning stated in § 5–508 of the Health – General
Article.
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Morticians and Funeral Directors.
7–205.
(c) In conjunction with the Office of Cemetery Oversight, the Board shall:
(1) Establish a process for regulating crematories and reduction facilities
that provides for:
(i) Registration of crematory operators and reduction operators or
issuance of permits for operating crematories and reduction facilities, and renewal;

HOUSE BILL 1555 9
(ii) Applications, including certification of ownership and
identification of individuals who will perform cremation, alkaline hydrolysis, or natural
organic reduction;
(iii) Registration or permit fees;
(iv) Inspections and oversight;
(v) Grounds for discipline and penalties; and
(vi) Complaints and hearings; [and]
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT REQUIRE FUNERAL
ESTABLISHMENTS, CREMATORIES, AND REDUCTION FACILITIES TO MAINTAIN
ADEQUATE REFRIGERATED HOLDING FACILITIES TO ENSURE PROPER STORAGE OF
HUMAN REMAINS; AND
[(2)] (3) Adopt regulations that are identical to regulations adopted by
the Director of the Office of Cemetery Oversight to:
(i) Implement [item] ITEMS (1) AND (2) of this subsection;
(ii) Ensure public health and safety; and
(iii) Meet the requirements of § 5–204(a)(3) of the Business
Regulation Article.
7–202.
(a) (1) The Board consists of 11 members.
(2) Of the 11 Board members:
(i) 6 shall be licensed morticians or licensed funeral directors; and
(ii) 5 shall be consumer members.
(3) All Board members shall be residents of the State.
(4) (I) The Governor shall appoint each member with the advice of the
Secretary, and with the advice and consent of the Senate.
(II) THE GOVERNOR SHALL DESIGNATE ONE MEMBER OF THE
BOARD TO SERVE AS PRESIDENT.

HOUSE BILL 1555
(5) The Board may not have more than one member who is employed by or
affiliated with, directly or indirectly, the same corporation, professional association, or
other entity, that owns, directly or through a subsidiary corporation, professional
association, or other entity, one or more funeral homes.
(i) (1) The Governor may remove an appointed member:
(i) For [incompetence or misconduct]:
1. REFUSING OR BEING UNABLE TO PERFORM BOARD
DUTIES IN AN EFFICIENT, RESPONSIBLE, AND PROFESSIONAL MANNER;
2. MISUSING THE MEMBER’S POSITION IN ORDER TO
OBTAIN FINANCIAL GAIN OR SEEK PERSONAL ADVANTAGE FOR THE MEMBER OR
OTHERS;
3. BEING FOUND GUILTY OR OTHERWISE SANCTIONED
IN A FINAL ADJUDICATION OR DETERMINATION BY ANY LAWFUL AUTHORITY FOR
ANY VIOLATION OF LAW SUBSTANTIALLY RELATED TO ANY PRACTICE GOVERNED
UNDER THIS TITLE; OR
4. ANY JUST AND REASONABLE CAUSE; or
(ii) Who, because of events that occur after the member’s
appointment or reappointment to the Board, causes the Board to be in violation of the
prohibition set forth in subsection (a)(5) of this section.
(2) [Upon] ON the recommendation of the Secretary, the Governor may
remove an appointed member whom the Secretary finds to have been absent from [2] TWO
successive Board meetings without adequate reason.
7–203.
(a) From among its members, the Board shall elect [a president,] a first vice
president[,] and a second vice president.
(b) The Board shall determine:
(1) The manner of election of officers;
(2) The term of office of each officer; and
(3) The duties of each officer.
7–204.

HOUSE BILL 1555 11
(a) (1) A majority of the [full authorized membership of] MEMBERS THEN
SERVING ON the Board is a quorum to do business.
(2) A MAJORITY VOTE OF THE QUORUM PRESENT AT A MEETING OF
THE BOARD IS REQUIRED FOR BINDING ACTION OF THE BOARD TO BE TAKEN.
(b) (1) The Board shall meet at least once a year, at the times and places that
it sets in its bylaws and rules and regulations.
(2) The Board shall hold special meetings that:
(i) It considers necessary; or
(ii) The Secretary directs.
(c) Each appointed member of the Board is entitled to:
(1) Compensation in accordance with the budget of the Board for each
meeting that the member attends; and
(2) Reimbursement for expenses at a rate determined by the Board.
7–205.1.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, ON
RECEIPT OF A COMPLAINT, BOARD STAFF SHALL PRESENT THE COMPLAINT TO THE
BOARD FOR REVIEW.
(B) IF THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR DETERMINES THAT A COMPLAINT
ALLEGES FACTS THAT, IF TRUE, WOULD POSE AN IMMINENT THREAT TO HUMAN
SAFETY, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY DIRECT THE IMMEDIATE INVESTIGATION
OF THE COMPLAINT.
(C) A COMPLAINT OPENED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL
BE PRESENTED TO THE BOARD FOR REVIEW AT THE NEXT SCHEDULED MEETING OF
THE BOARD.
7–209.
THE BOARD SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE,
ONLINE DATABASE THAT INCLUDES INFORMATION REGARDING EACH VIOLATION BY
DISCIPLINARY ACTION TAKEN BY THE BOARD UNDER § 7–316 OF THIS SUBTITLE

HOUSE BILL 1555
AGAINST, AND INSPECTION OF, AND COMPLAINT AGAINST EACH FUNERAL
ESTABLISHMENT;
(2) NOTIFY THE AUTHORIZING AGENT WITHIN 24 HOURS AFTER THE
BOARD BECOMES AWARE OF A DELAY, AN EQUIPMENT FAILURE, OR A REGULATORY
VIOLATION THAT INVOLVES A DECEDENT’S REMAINS; AND
(3) PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE EACH REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER §
7–210 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7–210.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31 EACH YEAR, THE BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A
REPORT TO THE SENATE FINANCE COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE HEALTH AND
GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THAT INCLUDES:
(1) THE RESULTS OF INSPECTIONS CONDUCTED UNDER § 7–409 OF
THIS TITLE, INCLUDING ANY VIOLATIONS AND CORRECTIVE ACTIONS TAKEN;
(2) THE NUMBER OF COMPLAINTS RECEIVED AND THE RESOLUTIONS
OF EACH COMPLAINT; AND
(3) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR IMPROVING THE REGULATION OF
FUNERAL ESTABLISHMENTS.
7–316.
(b) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 7–319 of this subtitle, the Board may
deny a license to an applicant for a funeral establishment license, reprimand the holder of
a funeral establishment license, place the holder of a funeral establishment license on
probation, or suspend or revoke a funeral establishment license if, with the knowledge or
at the direction of the funeral establishment:
(2) An employee of the funeral establishment fails to comply with §
5–513(b) [and] OR (d) of the Health – General Article; or
7–317.1.
IF THE BOARD FINDS THAT A PERSON HAS VIOLATED THIS TITLE WITH GROSS
NEGLIGENCE, IMPROPERLY HANDLED HUMAN REMAINS, OR REPEATEDLY VIOLATED
THIS TITLE, THE PERSON IS SUBJECT TO:
(1) A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $50,000 $25,000;

HOUSE BILL 1555 13
(2) PERMANENT REVOCATION OF LICENSURE; AND
(3) REFERRAL FOR CRIMINAL PROSECUTION.
7–318.1.
(A) IF THE BOARD REFERS A CASE TO THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL FOR PROSECUTION, A LIAISON SHALL BE ASSIGNED TO ASSIST THE
PROSECUTOR WITH THE PREPARATION OF THE CHARGES.
(B) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY DIRECT THE LIAISON TO PREPARE
CHARGES IF THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR DETERMINES THAT:
(1) A COMPLAINT THAT HAS BEEN REFERRED FOR PROSECUTION
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION ALLEGES FACTS THAT, IF TRUE, WOULD
POSE AN IMMINENT THREAT TO HUMAN SAFETY; OR
(2) OTHER EXIGENT CIRCUMSTANCES EXIST.
7–320.
[(c) If a person notes an appeal from an order of suspension or revocation by the
Board, the order is stayed.]
7–409.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, all inspections of
funeral establishments shall be unannounced and may take place at any time without
notice from the Board.
(2) (I) EACH YEAR, THE BOARD A TRAINED STAFF MEMBER OF THE
BOARD WHO IS QUALIFIED TO DO INSPECTIONS SHALL CONDUCT AT LEAST TWO
UNANNOUNCED INSPECTIONS OF EACH LICENSED FUNERAL ESTABLISHMENT THAT
IS UNDER PROBATION UNDER § 7–317 OF THIS TITLE TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH
THIS TITLE.
(II) IF A LICENSED FUNERAL ESTABLISHMENT IS CITED FOR A
SANITATION VIOLATION OR FOR THE MISHANDLING OF HUMAN REMAINS, THE
BOARD SHALL CONDUCT AN UNANNOUNCED INSPECTION OF THE LICENSED
FUNERAL ESTABLISHMENT WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE CITATION WAS ISSUED.
(3) THE BOARD SHALL EMPLOY AT LEAST ONE INSPECTOR TO:
(I) ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH REGULATORY REQUIREMENTS;

HOUSE BILL 1555
(II) CONDUCT ROUTINE AND COMPLAINT–BASED INSPECTIONS;
AND
(III) RESPOND TO PUBLIC CONCERNS REGARDING VIOLATIONS
OF THIS TITLE.
(b) An unannounced inspection may include advance notice that an inspector may
be in the region of the funeral establishment for the purpose of conducting an inspection if:
(1) The advance notice is no more than 14 days prior to the inspection;
(2) No specific date or time is provided for the inspection; and
(3) The advance notice is provided solely to ensure that a licensed
mortician or funeral director will be on–site for the inspection.
(c) (1) This subsection applies to inspections conducted:
(i) In response to valid information provided to the Board resulting
in a complaint being opened by the Board concerning the preparation or body storage areas
of a licensed funeral establishment only if the Board has provided a copy of the complaint
to the licensed funeral establishment; or
(ii) Of a funeral establishment that the Board has placed on
probationary status in accordance with § 7–316(b) of this title.
(2) A trained staff member of the Board who is qualified to do inspections
may call the supervising mortician of a licensed funeral establishment, as designated under
§ 7–310(e) of this title, and request immediate access to the preparation and body storage
areas of the funeral establishment.
(3) If a request is made under paragraph (2) of this subsection, the
supervising mortician immediately shall provide the staff member of the Board with the
location of the key or access code to the preparation or body storage areas of the funeral
establishment.
(4) An employee of a licensed funeral establishment is not required to
accompany a staff member of the Board while the staff member conducts an inspection of
a preparation or body storage area in accordance with this subsection.
(d) An unannounced inspection of a licensed funeral establishment shall be
conducted during the hours that the business of mortuary science is being conducted at the
licensed funeral establishment.
(e) Within 24 hours after the completion of an unannounced inspection of a
licensed funeral establishment, the Board shall provide the results of the inspection to:

HOUSE BILL 1555 15
(1) The holder of the funeral establishment license; or
(2) The supervising mortician for the licensed funeral establishment, as
designated under § 7–310(e) of this title.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
7–204.
(d) [(1)] The Board may appoint a Board secretary, who may be a member of the
Board.
[(2) The Board may employ inspectors and other staff in accordance with
the budget of the Board.]
(E) (1) THE SECRETARY MAY EMPLOY A STAFF FOR THE BOARD IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(2) THE SECRETARY MAY DESIGNATE ONE OF THE STAFF AS AN
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR.
(3) THE SECRETARY MAY SET THE COMPENSATION OF AN EMPLOYEE
OF THE BOARD IN A POSITION THAT:
(I) IS UNIQUE TO THE BOARD;
(II) REQUIRES SPECIFIC SKILLS OR EXPERIENCE TO PERFORM
THE DUTIES OF THE POSITION; AND
(III) DOES NOT REQUIRE THE EMPLOYEE TO PERFORM
FUNCTIONS THAT ARE COMPARABLE TO FUNCTIONS PERFORMED IN OTHER UNITS
OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
(4) THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE SECRETARY, SHALL DETERMINE THE POSITIONS FOR
WHICH THE SECRETARY MAY SET COMPENSATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
7–206.
(a) There is a State Board of Morticians and Funeral Directors Fund.

HOUSE BILL 1555
(d) (1) The Fund shall be used to cover the actual documented direct and
indirect costs of fulfilling the statutory and regulatory duties of the Board as provided by
the provisions of this article.
(2) The Fund is a continuing, nonlapsing fund, not subject to § 7–302 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) Any unspent portions of the Fund may not be transferred or revert to
the General Fund of the State, but shall remain in the Fund to be used for the purposes
specified in this article.
[(4) No other State money may be used to support the Fund.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective through September 30, 2028, and, at
the end of September 30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.